Connecticut, session 2026, SB00275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Secretary of the
2 Office of Policy and Management shall, within available appropriations,
3 establish a program to (1) provide any municipality with technical and
4 financial assistance concerning the electronic publication of municipal
5 budgets and other information concerning municipal finances on the
6 Internet web site of the municipality, and (2) adopt guidelines for best
7 practices concerning the publication of such budgets and information.
8 (b) The secretary shall establish an application procedure and any
9 criteria for a municipality's participation in the program as deemed
10 necessary by the secretary. The secretary may adopt regulations, in
11 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
12 implement the provisions of this section.
SB275 / File No. 154 1

SB275 File No. 154
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PD Joint Favorable
SB275 / File No. 154 2

SB275 File No. 154
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Office of Policy and Management (OPM) to
provide technical and financial assistance to support municipalities
publishing their budgets and other financial information on their
websites and adopt guidelines for such publication. This information is
already available on OPM’s website1, and it is anticipated that they can
provide technical assistance and establish guidelines within available
resources. There is a potential cost to OPM to the extent that financial
assistance is required by municipalities.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
1 OPM’s Municipal Budget Database-
https://opm-mbds.ct.gov/ords/r/mbds/mbds/budget-files?clear=5
OPM’s Electronic Audit Reporting System-
https://ears.opm.ct.gov/
OPM’s Municipal Fiscal Indicators-
https://portal.ct.gov/OPM/IGP-MUNFINS/Municipal-Financial-
Services/Municipal-Fiscal-Indicators
SB275 / File No. 154 3

SB275 File No. 154
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 275
AN ACT REQUIRING THE OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
TO ESTABLISH A PROGRAM TO ASSIST MUNICIPALITIES IN
PUBLISHING CERTAIN BUDGET INFORMATION.